Tennessee, session 114, SB1182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-36-202(a)(8), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(8) Make a report by February 1 of each year to the county legislative body of
the progress of the programs.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1182
003270
- 1 -